Alabama, session 2026rs, HB586.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
39
40 Section 1. Sections 8-42-1, 8-42-2, and 8-42-3, Section
41 34-27-2, as last amended by 2025-380, 2025 Regular Session,
42 Sections 34-27-30, and 34-27-36, as last amended by 2025-308,
43 2025 Regular Session, Code of Alabama 1975, are amended to
44 read as follows:
45 "§8-42-1
46 The Legislature finds and declares all of the
47 following:
48 (1) Wholesaling real property occurs when a buyer
49 enters into a contract for purchase and sale of a
50 single-family residential property with the seller of the
51 property thereby creating the buyer's equitable interest in
52 the property, the buyer then finds a subsequent purchaser
53 willing to pay a higher price for the property and then
54 assigns its interest to the subsequent purchaser for a fee.
55 Many modern real estate schemes no longer focus on the
56 legitimate purchase and ownership of property. Instead, they
Page 2

legitimate purchase and ownership of property. Instead, they
2J582II-1 03/17/2026 VSM (H) HSE 2026-828
House Boards, Agencies and Commissions Reported
Substitute for HB586
57 aim to extract economic value from property owners through
58 resale, assignment, optioning, and complex contract
59 structures. These schemes are carried out at scale by large
60 entities operating through networks of affiliates and
61 individuals. Although presented as real estate transactions,
62 these arrangements function in practice as financial
63 investment products secured by real estate and should be
64 regulated with the same transparency and oversight as other
65 financial investments and similar frauds. These practices most
66 often harm seniors, long-term owners, heirs, and financially
67 vulnerable families, and undermine confidence in the real
68 estate market.
69 (2) Certain unfair service agreements provide a real
70 estate company with the right to market, list, or assist in
71 selling a residential property for up to 40 years, binding
72 homeowners and successors in interest through a recorded
73 memorandum and penalizing the homeowner or successor in
74 interest for breach of the agreement.
75 (3) The practices of wholesaling residential real
76 estate, and recording these unfair service agreements, pose a
77 significant risk to Alabama homeowners if left unregulated.
78 (4) The lack of any restrictions enables predatory
79 practices against homeowners, especially those who have lived
80 in a home for a long period of time, leading to financial
81 loss, equity theft and resulting in confusion for unsuspecting
82 subsequent purchasers.
83 (5) The Legislature concludes the following in the
84 interest of protecting Alabama homeowners and home buyers
Page 3

interest of protecting Alabama homeowners and home buyers
2J582II-1 03/17/2026 VSM (H) HSE 2026-828
House Boards, Agencies and Commissions Reported
Substitute for HB586
85 property owners:
86 a. Disclosure of the limited interest, marketing, and
87 assignment of the buyer's equitable interest in the
88 homeowner's property should be required of buyers engaging in
89 wholesaling.
90 b. Unfair service agreements create clouds on the
91 titles of Alabama homes and burden Alabama homeowners with
92 false promises, are against the public interest, and
93 constitute unreasonable restraints on the alienation of real
94 property.
95 c. Investment-oriented solicitations involving real
96 property present risks comparable to those of securities
97 transactions and warrant disclosure-based regulation.
98 d. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
99 infringe on the private property rights of an individual to
100 acquire real property for his or her own use, ownership, or
101 benefit.
102 e. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
103 require an individual to be licensed in order to acquire real
104 property for his or her own use, ownership, or benefit.
105 f. The Legislature finds that unsolicited offers to
106 purchase real property may present a heightened risk of
107 unfairness, particularly when the purchase price is below the
108 real property's most recent tax assessed value, when the
109 seller is an individual in need of protective services and
110 vulnerable to elder abuse and exploitation as defined in
111 Chapter 9 of Title 38, or the seller did not receive the
112 professional assistance of a licensed real estate agent, as
Page 4

professional assistance of a licensed real estate agent, as
2J582II-1 03/17/2026 VSM (H) HSE 2026-828
House Boards, Agencies and Commissions Reported
Substitute for HB586
113 defined in Chapter 27 of Title 34, or a licensed attorney, as
114 defined in Chapter 3 of Title 34."
115 "§8-42-2
116 (a) A person may acquire an equitable interest in a
117 single-family residential property as the buyer under a
118 contract for the purchase and sale of the property and then
119 may assign or offer to assign the interest for a fee if the
120 buyer discloses in writing all of the following:
121 (1) To any potential subsequent purchaser or assignee,
122 the nature of the buyer's equitable interest that the seller
123 of the equitable interest is not the deed holder of the
124 property and is only offering to sell or assign his or her
125 equitable interest.;
126 (2) To the seller of the property, the buyer's intent
127 to market or assign its equitable interest in the seller's
128 real estate prior to commencing any marketing of the
129 property.;
130 (3) To the seller of the property, the The effective
131 date of any assignment of the buyer's interest to a subsequent
132 purchaser of the property at least three business calendar
133 days prior to the effective date of any assignment.; and
134 (4) A fixed closing date with no automatic extensions
135 in the contract that established the equitable interest.
136 (b) Written disclosure under subsection (a) shall be
137 required for the intent to market and transfer an equitable
138 interest in residential real property, as limited by
139 subsection (d), whether by assignment, novation, or any other
140 similar method of transferring an interest in real property.
Page 5

similar method of transferring an interest in real property.
2J582II-1 03/17/2026 VSM (H) HSE 2026-828
House Boards, Agencies and Commissions Reported
Substitute for HB586
141 (c)(1) A violation of this section is a Class C
142 misdemeanor.
143 (2) In addition to criminal penalties, a person
144 violating this section may be liable to the person to whom
145 disclosure is required in an amount equal to three times the
146 fee or amount received by the buyer pursuant to the assignment
147 subject to civil fines and penalties as determined by the
148 commission pursuant to Section 8-42-1.3 and by the Alabama
149 Real Estate Commission pursuant to Section 34-27-36.
150 (3) Enforcement of this section shall be governed by
151 Section 8-42-1.2.
152 (d) This section shall only apply to transactions
153 involving single-family residential property and shall not
154 apply to any other property transactions.
155 (e) This section shall not infringe on the right of the
156 parties to otherwise agree by contract.
157 (f) This section shall not apply to predevelopment
158 activity for residential subdivisions, condominiums, or other
159 residential predevelopment activity."
160 "§8-42-3
161 (a) For purposes of this section the following terms
162 have the following meanings:
163 (1) RECORDING. Presenting a document to a county judge
164 of probate for official placement in the public land records.
165 (2) RESIDENTIAL REAL ESTATE. Real property located in
166 this state which is used primarily for a dwelling and contains
167 one to four dwelling units.
168 (3) SERVICE AGREEMENT. A contract under which a person
Page 6

(3) SERVICE AGREEMENT. A contract under which a person
2J582II-1 03/17/2026 VSM (H) HSE 2026-828
House Boards, Agencies and Commissions Reported
Substitute for HB586
169 agrees to provide services in connection with the purchase or
170 sale of residential real estate.
171 (4) SERVICE PROVIDER. An individual or entity that
172 provides services to another party under a service agreement.
173 (5) UNFAIR SERVICE AGREEMENT. A service agreement in
174 which the services subject to the agreement are not performed
175 within one year after the date upon which the agreement
176 commences and provides any of the following:
177 a. Purports to run with the land or to be binding on
178 future owners of interests in the real property.
179 b. Allows for assignment of the right to provide the
180 service without notice and agreement of the owner of
181 residential real estate.
182 c. Purports to create a lien, encumbrance, or other
183 real property security interest.
184 (b)(a) This chapter does not apply to any of the
185 following:
186 (1) A home warranty or other type of similar product
187 that covers the cost of maintenance of for a major housing
188 home system, such as plumbing or electrical wiring, for a set
189 period of time from the date a house is sold.
190 (2) An insurance contract.
191 (3) An option to purchase or right of refusal to
192 purchase real estate.
193 (4) A maintenance or repair agreement entered into by a
194 homeowners' association in a common interest community.
195 (5) Agreements to manage residential real estate.
196 (6) A declaration of any covenants, conditions, or
Page 7

(6) A declaration of any covenants, conditions, or
2J582II-1 03/17/2026 VSM (H) HSE 2026-828
House Boards, Agencies and Commissions Reported
Substitute for HB586
197 restrictions created in the formation of a homeowners'
198 association, a group of condominium owners, or other common
199 interest community, or an amendment to the declaration.
200 (7) A mortgage loan or commitment to make or receive a
201 mortgage loan.
202 (8) A security agreement under Alabama's Uniform
203 Commercial Code, relating to the sale or rental of personal
204 property or fixtures.
205 (9) Water, sewer, electrical, telephone, cable, or
206 other regulated utility service providers.
207 (c)(b) This section does not impair the rights granted
208 by a mechanic's or materialman's lien under Division 8 of
209 Article 5 of Chapter 11 of Title 35, or by another any other
210 judicially imposed lien.
211 (d)(c) If a service agreement is unfair under this
212 section chapter, it is unenforceable.
213 (e)(d) If a person enters into an unfair service
214 agreement with a consumer, that agreement shall be deemed a
215 deceptive act under the Deceptive Trade Practices Act,
216 commencing with Section 8-19-1.
217 (f)(e)(1) No person shall record or cause to be
218 recorded an unfair service agreement, or a notice or
219 memorandum of an unfair service agreement, in the this state.
220 (2) If an unfair service agreement is recorded in this
221 state, it the agreement shall not be deemed to provide actual
222 or constructive notice against an otherwise bona fide
223 purchaser of the residential real property to which it the
224 agreement pertains, or against a creditor with a security
Page 8

agreement pertains, or against a creditor with a security
2J582II-1 03/17/2026 VSM (H) HSE 2026-828
House Boards, Agencies and Commissions Reported
Substitute for HB586
225 interest in the residential real property to which it pertains
226 that property.
227 (3) A service provider who records or causes to be
228 recorded an unfair service agreement, or a notice or
229 memorandum thereof of an unfair service agreement, in this
230 state is liable to an affected party for statutory damages in
231 the amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in statutory
232 damages.
233 (g)(f) If an unfair service agreement, or a notice or
234 memorandum of an unfair service agreement, is recorded in the
235 state, any party with an interest in the residential real
236 property to which it the agreement pertains may take either or
237 both of the following actions:
238 (1) Apply to the circuit court in the county where the
239 recording exists is located to seek a court order declaring
240 the agreement is void and of no effect.
241 (2) In addition to the statutory damages described in
242 subdivision (f) (e)(3), recover actual damages, plus costs and
243 attorney fees as may be proven against the service provider
244 who recorded the agreement."
245 "§34-27-2
246 (a) For purposes of Articles 1 and 2 of this chapter,
247 the following terms have the following meanings:
248 (1) ASSOCIATE BROKER. Any broker other than a
249 qualifying broker.
250 (2) BROKER. Any person licensed as a real estate broker
251 under Articles 1 and 2 of this chapter.
252 (3) BUYER'S AGREEMENT. An agreement between a real
Page 9

(3) BUYER'S AGREEMENT. An agreement between a real
2J582II-1 03/17/2026 VSM (H) HSE 2026-828
House Boards, Agencies and Commissions Reported
Substitute for HB586
253 estate company and a person through under which the company
254 agrees to assist the person with the purchase of real property
255 in exchange for a fee, whether as a fiduciary or
256 non-fiduciary.
257 (4) COMMISSION. The Alabama Real Estate Commission,
258 except where the context requires that it means the fee paid
259 to a broker or salesperson.
260 (5) COMMISSIONER. A member of the commission.
261 (6) COMPANY. Any sole proprietorship, corporation,
262 partnership, branch office, or lawfully constituted business
263 organization as the Legislature may provide for from time to
264 time, which is licensed as a company under Articles 1 and 2 of
265 this chapter.
266 (7) ENGAGE. Contractual relationships between a
267 qualifying broker and an associate broker or salesperson
268 licensed under him or her, whether the relationship is
269 employer-employee, independent contractor, or otherwise.
270 (8) EQUITABLE INTEREST. Any interest or right in a
271 contract or agreement to purchase residential real estate held
272 by a party to that contract or agreement.
273 (9) INACTIVE LICENSE. A license which that is being
274 held by the commission office by law, order of the commission,
275 at the request of the licensee, or which is renewable but is
276 not currently valid because of a failure to renew.
277 (10) LICENSE PERIOD. That period of time beginning on
278 October 1 of a year designated by the commission to be the
279 first year of a license period and ending on midnight
280 September 30 of the year designated by the commission as the
Page 10

September 30 of the year designated by the commission as the
2J582II-1 03/17/2026 VSM (H) HSE 2026-828
House Boards, Agencies and Commissions Reported
Substitute for HB586
281 final year of that license period.
282 (9)(11) LICENSEE. Any broker, salesperson, or company.
283 (11)(12) LISTING AGREEMENT. An agreement between a
284 company and an owner wherein under which the company agrees to
285 assist the owner in the sale of the owner's real property in
286 exchange for a fee, whether as a fiduciary or a non-fiduciary.
287 The term includes an agreement giving the company the right to
288 list or market the owner's real property upon the owner's
289 future decision to sell the property.
290 (13) NET LISTING AGREEMENT. An agreement that
291 stipulates a net price to be received by the owner with the
292 excess due to be received by a licensee as commission.
293 (12)(14) PERSON. A natural person.
294 (13)(15) PLACE OF BUSINESS.
295 a. A licensed broker living residing in a rural area of
296 this state who operates and operating from his or her home,
297 provided that he or she sets up establishes and maintains an
298 office for the conduct of the real estate business, which
299 shall not be used for living purposes or occupancy other than
300 the conduct of the real estate business. The office shall be
301 used by the broker only and not as a place of business from
302 which any additional licensee operates under his or her
303 license. The office shall have a separate business telephone,
304 have a separate entrance, and be properly identified as a real
305 estate office.
306 b. All licensees located within the city limits or
307 police jurisdiction of a municipality shall operate from a an
308 office with a separate office located in the city limits or
Page 11

office with a separate office located in the city limits or
2J582II-1 03/17/2026 VSM (H) HSE 2026-828
House Boards, Agencies and Commissions Reported
Substitute for HB586
309 police jurisdiction address. The office shall have a business
310 telephone, meet comply with all other regulations commission
311 rules of the Real Estate Commission, and be properly
312 identified as a real estate office. Hardship cases may be
313 subject to waiver of exempt from this regulation upon
314 application and approval by the commission.
315 c. All business records and files shall be kept at the
316 place of business as required by in accordance with applicable
317 law or Real Estate Commission rules.
318 (14)(16) PRINCIPAL BROKER. As used in other states, the
319 term has the same meaning as "qualifying broker" in this
320 state.
321 (15)(17) QUALIFYING BROKER. A broker under whom a sole
322 proprietorship, corporation, partnership, branch office, or
323 lawfully constituted business organization, as the Legislature
324 may from time to time provide, is licensed, or a broker
325 licensed as a company to do business as a sole proprietorship
326 who is responsible for supervising the acts of the company or
327 proprietorship and all associated real estate licensees
328 licensed therewith.
329 (16)(18) REAL ESTATE WHOLESALING. The practice of
330 assigning or marketing the assignment of an equitable interest
331 in residential property for profit.
332 (19) RECOVERY FUND. The Alabama Real Estate Recovery
333 Fund.
334 (17)(20) RESIDENTIAL. Real property located in this
335 state which is used primarily for a dwelling and contains one
336 to four dwelling units.
Page 12

to four dwelling units.
2J582II-1 03/17/2026 VSM (H) HSE 2026-828
House Boards, Agencies and Commissions Reported
Substitute for HB586
337 (21) SALESPERSON. Any person licensed as a real estate
338 salesperson under Articles 1 and 2 of this chapter.
339 (18)(22) TEAM. Two or more licensees within the same
340 company who work together to provide services for which a
341 license is required and who hold themselves out to the public
342 as a distinct group within the company.
343 (b) The licensing requirements of Articles 1 and 2 of
344 this chapter shall not apply to any of the following persons
345 and transactions:
346 (1) Any owner in the managing of, or in or consummating
347 a real estate transaction involving, his or, her, or its own
348 real estate or the real estate of his or her spouse, child, or
349 parent. This exception does not apply to real estate
350 wholesaling unless the sale is to a spouse, child, or parent,
351 or unless the property is in a predevelopment stage.
352 (2) An attorney-at-law performing his or her duties as
353 an attorney-at-law.
354 (3) Persons acting without compensation and in good
355 faith under a duly executed power of attorney authorizing the
356 consummation of a real estate transaction.
357 (4) Persons or a state or federally chartered financial
358 institution acting as a receiver, trustee, administrator,
359 executor, or guardian; or acting under a court order or under
360 the authority of a trust instrument or will.
361 (5) Public officers performing their official duties.
362 (6) Persons performing general clerical or
363 administrative duties for a broker so long as, provided the
364 person does not physically show listed property.
Page 13

person does not physically show listed property.
2J582II-1 03/17/2026 VSM (H) HSE 2026-828
House Boards, Agencies and Commissions Reported
Substitute for HB586
365 (7) Persons acting as the manager for of an apartment
366 building or complex. However, this exception shall not apply
367 to a person acting as an on-site manager of a condominium
368 building or complex.
369 (8) Persons licensed as time-share sellers under
370 Article 3 of this chapter performing who perform an act
371 consistent with that article.
372 (9) Transactions involving the sale, lease, or transfer
373 of cemetery lots.
374 (c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b)(1), the licensing
375 requirements in Articles 1 and 2 of this chapter shall apply
376 to any person or entity that engages in real estate
377 wholesaling, unless the sale is to a spouse, child, or parent,
378 or unless the property is in a predevelopment stage."
379 "§34-27-30
380 It shall be unlawful for any person, sole
381 proprietorship, partnership, corporation, branch office, or
382 lawfully constituted business organization, as the Legislature
383 may from time to time provide, for a fee, commission, or other
384 valuable consideration, or with the intention or expectation
385 of receiving or collecting a fee, commission, or other
386 valuable consideration from another, to do any of the
387 following unless licensed under Articles 1 and 2 of this
388 chapter:
389 (1) Sell, exchange, purchase, rent, or lease real
390 estate situated within the State of Alabama.
391 (2) Offer to sell, exchange, purchase, rent, or lease
392 real estate situated within the State of Alabama.
Page 14

real estate situated within the State of Alabama.
2J582II-1 03/17/2026 VSM (H) HSE 2026-828
House Boards, Agencies and Commissions Reported
Substitute for HB586
393 (3) Negotiate or attempt to negotiate the listing,
394 sale, exchange, purchase, rental, or leasing of real estate
395 situated within the State of Alabama.
396 (4) List or offer or attempt or agree to list real
397 estate for sale, rental, lease, exchange, or trade situated
398 within the State of Alabama.
399 (5) Auction, offer, or attempt or agree to auction,
400 real estate situated within the State of Alabama.
401 (6) Buy or sell or offer to buy or sell, or otherwise
402 deal in options on real estate situated within the State of
403 Alabama.
404 (7) Aid, attempt, or offer to aid in locating or
405 obtaining for purchase, rent, or lease any real estate
406 situated within the State of Alabama.
407 (8) Procure or assist in procuring of prospects for the
408 purpose of effecting the sale, exchange, lease, or rental of
409 real estate situated within the State of Alabama.
410 (9) Procure or assist in the procuring of properties
411 for the purpose of effecting the sale, exchange, lease, or
412 rental of real estate situated within the State of Alabama.
413 (10) Present himself or herself, or be presented, as
414 being able to perform an act for which a license is required.
415 (11) Real estate wholesaling."
416 "§34-27-36
417 (a)(1) The commission or its staff, on its own
418 initiative or on the a verified written complaint in writing
419 of by any person, may investigate the actions and records of a
420 licensee. The commission may issue subpoenas and compel the
Page 15

licensee. The commission may issue subpoenas and compel the
2J582II-1 03/17/2026 VSM (H) HSE 2026-828
House Boards, Agencies and Commissions Reported
Substitute for HB586
421 testimony of witnesses and the production of records and
422 documents during an investigation. If probable cause is found,
423 a formal complaint shall be filed, and the commission shall
424 hold a hearing on the formal complaint.
425 (2) In each instance in which a licensee is found in
426 violation of any of the conduct prohibited in subsection (b),
427 the commission may impose any of the following penalties:
428 a. A fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100)
429 nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000).
430 b. Require the licensee to complete an approved
431 education course or courses in addition to completing the
432 existing continuing education requirements.
433 c. Issue a public reprimand.
434 d. Revoke or suspend any or all licenses held by the
435 licensee under this chapter by the licensee. The suspension
436 may continue until such time as the licensee has completed an
437 approved continuing education course, has made restitution to
438 accounts containing funds to be held for other parties, or
439 both. The commission may also stay the revocation or
440 suspension of a license and require completion of an approved
441 education course, require the making of restitution to
442 accounts containing funds to be held for other parties, or
443 both.
444 (b) A licensee is prohibited from doing all of the
445 following:
446 (1) Procuring or attempting to procure a license for
447 himself or herself or another by fraud, misrepresentation, or
448 deceit, or by making a material misstatement of fact in an
Page 16

deceit, or by making a material misstatement of fact in an
2J582II-1 03/17/2026 VSM (H) HSE 2026-828
House Boards, Agencies and Commissions Reported
Substitute for HB586
449 application for a license.
450 (2) Engaging in misrepresentation or dishonest or
451 fraudulent acts when selling, buying, trading, or renting real
452 property of his or her own or of a spouse, child, or parent.
453 (3) Making a material misrepresentation or failing to
454 disclose to a potential purchaser or lessee any latent
455 structural defect or any other defect known to the licensee.
456 Latent structural defects and other defects do not refer to
457 trivial or insignificant defects but refer to those defects
458 that would be a significant factor to a reasonable and prudent
459 person in making a decision to purchase or lease.
460 (4) Making any false promises of a character likely to
461 influence, persuade, or induce any person to enter into any
462 contract or agreement.
463 (5) Pursuing a continued and flagrant course of
464 misrepresentation or the making of false promises through
465 agents or salespersons or any medium of advertising or
466 otherwise.
467 (6) Publishing or causing to be published any
468 advertisement that deceives or that is likely to deceive the
469 public, or that in any manner tends to create a misleading
470 impression.
471 (7) Acting for more than one party in a transaction
472 without the knowledge and written consent of all parties for
473 whom he or she acts.
474 (8)a. Failing, within a reasonable time, to properly
475 account for or remit money coming that comes into his or her
476 possession which and belongs to others, or commingling money
Page 17

possession which and belongs to others, or commingling money
2J582II-1 03/17/2026 VSM (H) HSE 2026-828
House Boards, Agencies and Commissions Reported
Substitute for HB586
477 belonging to others with his or her own funds.
478 b. Failing to deposit and account for at all times all
479 funds belonging to others, or being held for others, in a
480 separate federally insured account or accounts in at a
481 financial institution located in Alabama.
482 c. Failing to keep for at least three years a complete
483 record of funds belonging to others showing to whom the money
484 belongs, the date deposited, the date of withdrawal, and other
485 pertinent information for at least three years.
486 (9) Placing a sign on any property offering it for
487 sale, lease, or rent without the consent of the owner.
488 (10) Failing to voluntarily furnish a copy of each
489 listing, contract, lease, and other document to each party
490 executing the document with reasonable promptness.
491 (11) Paying any profit, compensation, commission, or
492 fee to, or dividing any profit, compensation, commission, or
493 fee with, anyone other than a licensee or a multiple listing
494 service. This subdivision shall not prevent an associate
495 broker or salesperson from owning any lawfully constituted
496 business organization, including, but not limited to, a
497 corporation or, limited liability company, or limited
498 liability corporation, for the purpose of receiving payments
499 contemplated in this subsection. The business organization
500 shall not be required to be licensed under this chapter, and
501 shall not engage in any other activity requiring a real estate
502 license.
503 (12) Paying or receiving any rebate from any person in
504 a real estate transaction.
Page 18

a real estate transaction.
2J582II-1 03/17/2026 VSM (H) HSE 2026-828
House Boards, Agencies and Commissions Reported
Substitute for HB586
505 (13) Inducing any party to a contract to breach the
506 contract for the purpose of substituting a new contract, where
507 the substitution is motivated by the personal gain of the
508 licensee licensee's personal gain.
509 (14) If the licensee is a salesperson or associate
510 broker, accepting a commission or other valuable consideration
511 for performing any act for which a license is required from
512 any person or company, except his or her qualifying broker.
513 (15) If the licensee is a qualifying broker or company,
514 allowing a salesperson or associate broker licensed under him
515 or her to advertise himself or herself as a real estate agent
516 without the name or trade name of the qualifying broker or
517 company appearing prominently on the advertising; or, if the
518 licensee is a salesperson or associate broker, advertising
519 himself or herself as a real estate agent without the name or
520 trade name of the qualifying broker or company under whom the
521 salesperson or associate broker is licensed appearing
522 prominently on the advertising. For purposes of this
523 subdivision, "prominently" means using a font size that is
524 equal to or larger than any other name, text, or logo, other
525 than terms like "for sale" or "for lease," in the
526 advertisement and situated and sized for the purpose of
527 gaining the attention of consumers viewing the advertisement.
528 (16) Establishing an association, by employment or
529 otherwise, with an unlicensed person who is expected or
530 required to act as a licensee, or aiding, abetting, or
531 conspiring with a person to circumvent the requirements of
532 this chapter.
Page 19

this chapter.
2J582II-1 03/17/2026 VSM (H) HSE 2026-828
House Boards, Agencies and Commissions Reported
Substitute for HB586
533 (17) Failing to disclose to an owner the licensee's
534 intention to acquire, directly or indirectly, an interest in
535 property which he or she or his or her associates have been
536 employed to sell.
537 (18) Violating or disregarding any provision of this
538 chapter or any rule, regulation, or order of the commission.
539 (19) If a broker accepts Accepting a "net listing"
540 agreement for the sale of real property or any interest
541 therein in real property where the licensee is not a buyer,
542 seller, or assigning buyer in the transaction. A "net listing"
543 agreement stipulates a net price to be received by the owner
544 with the excess due to be received by the broker as his or her
545 commission.
546 (20) Misrepresenting or failing to disclose to any
547 lender, guaranteeing agency, or any other interested party,
548 the true terms of a sale of real estate.
549 (21) Failing to inform the buyer or seller at the time
550 an offer is presented that he or she will be expected to pay
551 certain closing costs and the approximate amount of those
552 costs.
553 (22)a. Having entered a plea of guilty or nolo
554 contendere to, or having been found guilty of or convicted of,
555 a felony or a crime involving moral turpitude.
556 b. Having a final money judgment rendered against him
557 or her which results from an act or omission occurring in the
558 pursuit of his or her real estate business or involves the
559 goodwill of an existing real estate business.
560 (23) Offering free lots or conducting lotteries for the
Page 20

(23) Offering free lots or conducting lotteries for the
2J582II-1 03/17/2026 VSM (H) HSE 2026-828
House Boards, Agencies and Commissions Reported
Substitute for HB586
561 purpose of influencing a party to purchase or lease real
562 estate.
563 (24) Failing to include a fixed date of expiration in a
564 written listing agreement or failing to leave a copy of the
565 agreement with the principal.
566 (25) Conduct that constitutes or demonstrates dishonest
567 dealings, bad faith, or untrustworthiness.
568 (26) Acting negligently or incompetently in performing
569 an act for which a person is required to hold a real estate
570 license.
571 (27) Failing or refusing, on demand, to produce a
572 document, book, or record in his or her the licensee's
573 possession concerning a real estate transaction conducted by
574 him or her for inspection by the commission or, its authorized
575 personnel, or representative.
576 (28) Failing within a reasonable time to provide
577 information requested by the commission during an
578 investigation or after a formal complaint has been filed.
579 (29) Failing without cause to surrender to the rightful
580 owner, on demand, a document or instrument coming that comes
581 into his or her the licensee's or its possession.
582 (30) If a qualifying broker or company, failing to keep
583 in his, her, or its files copies of all contracts, leases,
584 listings, and other records pertinent to real estate
585 transactions for a period of three years.
586 (31) When engaging in real estate wholesaling, failing
587 to provide the required buyer and seller disclosures pursuant
588 to Section 8-42-2.
Page 21

to Section 8-42-2.
2J582II-1 03/17/2026 VSM (H) HSE 2026-828
House Boards, Agencies and Commissions Reported
Substitute for HB586
589 (c) If it appears that a person or business entity has
590 engaged, or is about to engage, in an act or practice
591 constituting a violation of Article 1 or 2 of this chapter or
592 any rule or order of the commission, the commission, through
593 the Attorney General or the Alabama Securities Commission, may
594 institute legal actions to enjoin the act or practice and to
595 enforce compliance with Articles 1 and 2 of this chapter or
596 any rule or order of the commission. To prevail in an action,
597 it shall not be necessary to allege or prove either that an
598 adequate remedy at law does not exist or that substantial or
599 irreparable damage would result from the continued violation.
600 (d)(1) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the
601 commission may issue an order requiring any accused person or
602 business entity to cease and desist from engaging in
603 activities requiring a license under this chapter when the
604 accused person or business entity is not licensed under this
605 chapter. The order shall be entered by the executive director
606 after a finding of probable cause by the commission staff. The
607 order shall become final 15 days after its service upon the
608 accused, unless the accused requests a hearing before the
609 commission. Upon hearing the case and finding violations, the
610 commission may do any of the following:
611 a. make Make the cease and desist order final.
612 b. and the commission may impose Impose a fine for each
613 violation in an amount consistent with the range of fines
614 applicable to licensees.
615 c., and in addition, may impose Impose a fine in the
616 amount of any gain or economic benefit that was derived from
Page 22

amount of any gain or economic benefit that was derived from
2J582II-1 03/17/2026 VSM (H) HSE 2026-828
House Boards, Agencies and Commissions Reported
Substitute for HB586
617 the violation.
618 d., and in addition, may impose Impose a fine in the
619 amount of the commission's costs incurred by the commission.
620 Any fines not paid as ordered shall be enforceable in any
621 court with competent jurisdiction and proper venue.
622 (2) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the
623 commission may decline to issue an order requiring any accused
624 person or business entity to cease and desist from engaging in
625 activities requiring a license under this chapter when the
626 accused person or business entity is not licensed under this
627 chapter. In this instance, the commission shall proceed to
628 give appropriate notice of the violations and hold a hearing.
629 Upon hearing the case and finding violations, the commission
630 may:
631 a. impose Impose a fine for each violation in an amount
632 consistent with the range of fines applicable to licensees;
633 b., and in addition, may impose Impose a fine in the
634 amount of any gain or economic benefit that was derived from
635 the violation;
636 c., and in addition, may impose Impose a fine in the
637 amount of the commission's costs incurred. Any fine or fines
638 not paid as ordered shall be enforceable in any court with
639 competent jurisdiction and proper venue.; or
640 d. In matters involving real estate wholesaling, refer
641 the matter to the Alabama Securities Commission for
642 investigation and adjudication.
643 (3) Any fine or fines imposed by this subsection that
644 are not paid as ordered shall be enforceable in any court of
Page 23

are not paid as ordered shall be enforceable in any court of
2J582II-1 03/17/2026 VSM (H) HSE 2026-828
House Boards, Agencies and Commissions Reported
Substitute for HB586
645 competent jurisdiction and proper venue.
646 (e) The commission shall notify the licensee and
647 qualifying broker in writing regarding the complaint.
648 (f) The commission shall notify the complainant,
649 licensee, and qualifying broker in writing regarding of the
650 disposition of the complaint.
651 (g) If a licensee presents a form of payment to the
652 commission, or to any third party on the commission's behalf,
653 which that is declined or rejected by a financial institution
654 or merchant service company, the licensee shall have 30 days,
655 upon from electronic notification from by the commission, to
656 submit full and valid payment for of the initial fee or fine
657 and, plus an additional fee for submitting the faulty payment,
658 not to exceed the maximum amount allowed by Section 8-8-15.
659 Failure to submit full and valid payment within 30 days of
660 electronic notification by the commission shall result in the
661 licensee's license becoming inactive until the licensee
662 submits full payment. Failure to submit full and valid payment
663 within six months after electronic notification by the
664 commission shall result in the licensee's license lapsing."
665 Section 2. Sections 8-42-1.1, 8-42-1.2, 8-42-1.3, and
666 8-42-4, are added to the Code of Alabama 1975, to read as
667 follows:
668 §8-42-1.1
669 For purposes of this chapter the following terms have
670 the following meanings:
671 (1) CLOSING. The transfer of legal title to real
672 property from a property owner to another person or entity
Page 24

property from a property owner to another person or entity
2J582II-1 03/17/2026 VSM (H) HSE 2026-828
House Boards, Agencies and Commissions Reported
Substitute for HB586
673 through the delivery of a deed or other instrument of
674 conveyance for consideration.
675 (2) COMMISSION. The Alabama Securities Commission.
676 (3) CONTACT. Any communication delivered by mail,
677 courier, email, text message, social media message, telephone
678 call, voicemail, prerecorded message, or similar method.
679 (4) EQUITABLE INTEREST. Any interest or right in a
680 contract or agreement to purchase residential real estate held
681 by a party to that contract or agreement.
682 (5) INVESTMENT-ORIENTED REAL PROPERTY SOLICITATION. Any
683 communication, offer, agreement, or transaction involving real
684 property in which the expected economic benefit to the
685 offeror, directly or indirectly, is derived primarily from
686 resale, assignment, appreciation, fee extraction, or
687 contractual arbitrage, rather than occupancy or personal use
688 by the offeror.
689 (6) OFFEREE. A real property owner who receives a
690 purchase offer.
691 (7) OFFEROR. A person or entity acting directly or
692 indirectly on behalf of another who makes an offer to purchase
693 real property.
694 (8) REAL ESTATE WHOLESALING. The practice of assigning
695 or marketing the assignment of an equitable interest in
696 residential property for profit.
697 (9) RECORDING. Presenting a document to a county judge
698 of probate for official placement in the public land records.
699 (10) RESIDENTIAL REAL ESTATE. Real property located in
700 this state which is used primarily for a dwelling and contains
Page 25

this state which is used primarily for a dwelling and contains
2J582II-1 03/17/2026 VSM (H) HSE 2026-828
House Boards, Agencies and Commissions Reported
Substitute for HB586
701 one to four dwelling units.
702 (11) SELLER. An offeree who signs a purchase contract.
703 (12) SERVICE AGREEMENT. A contract under which a person
704 agrees to provide services in connection with the purchase or
705 sale of residential real estate.
706 (13) SERVICE PROVIDER. An individual or entity that
707 provides services to another party under a service agreement.
708 (14) UNFAIR SERVICE AGREEMENT. A service agreement in
709 which the services subject to the agreement are not performed
710 within one year after the date upon which the agreement
711 commences and provides any of the following:
712 a. Purports to run with the land or to be binding on
713 future owners of interests in the real property.
714 b. Allows for assignment of the right to provide the
715 service without notice and agreement of the owner of
716 residential real estate.
717 c. Purports to create a lien, encumbrance, or other
718 real property security interest.
719 (15) UNSOLICITED COMMUNICATION. Any communication sent
720 to a real property owner when the owner has not requested or
721 invited the contact, given prior consent to be contacted, or
722 entered into a written agreement with the sender concerning
723 the property.
724 §8-42-1.2
725 (a) The commission shall have authority under this
726 chapter to administer, implement, and enforce all regulated
727 conduct, individuals, and entities in this chapter, along with
728 issuing licenses for these activities. This authority extends
Page 26

issuing licenses for these activities. This authority extends
2J582II-1 03/17/2026 VSM (H) HSE 2026-828
House Boards, Agencies and Commissions Reported
Substitute for HB586
729 to regulating investment-oriented real estate solicitations,
730 recorded service agreements, unfair service agreements,
731 unsolicited offers, and related practices. This exclusive
732 authority applies regardless of any license an individual or
733 entity may hold under any other legal provision. The Alabama
734 Real Estate Commission shall have concurrent authority with
735 the commission to regulate assignments or offerings of
736 assignments of equitable interests. This authority shall not
737 preclude the Board of Commissioners of the Alabama State Bar
738 from pursuing professional licensing violations under Chapter
739 3 of Title 34.
740 (b) The commission may adopt rules necessary to carry
741 out this chapter, including, but not limited to, rules
742 governing:
743 (1) Consumer complaint intake and resolution
744 procedures;
745 (2) Establishment of a consumer complaint hotline that
746 allows consumers to verify the licenses of regulated entities
747 under this chapter.
748 (2) Disclosure forms and content;
749 (3) Examination, reporting, and recordkeeping
750 requirements;
751 (4) Other than real estate wholesaling, which is
752 licensed by the Alabama Real Estate Commission, any licensing,
753 permitting, or registration program and fees established by
754 rule;
755 (5) Any renewal, suspension, or revocation program
756 established by rule;
Page 27

established by rule;
2J582II-1 03/17/2026 VSM (H) HSE 2026-828
House Boards, Agencies and Commissions Reported
Substitute for HB586
757 (6) Penalty schedules and remedial measures;
758 (7) Defining additional unfair, deceptive, or abusive
759 practices; or
760 (8) Definitions and standards necessary to preclude
761 circumvention of this chapter.
762 (c) The commission may:
763 (1) Conduct investigations and examinations;
764 (2) Require the production of documents and testimony;
765 (3) Issue subpoenas;
766 (4) Issue cease and desist orders;
767 (5) Suspend, revoke, or condition any license, permit,
768 or registration established by rule;
769 (6) Impose administrative fines and penalties for each
770 violation;
771 (7) Order restitution, rescission, disgorgement, or
772 other remedial relief;
773 (8) Prosecute criminal violations where authorized by
774 law; or
775 (9) Coordinate with other agencies as authorized by
776 law.
777 (d) The commission may bring an action in any court of
778 appropriate jurisdiction for:
779 (1) Injunctive or other relief;
780 (2) Civil penalties;
781 (3) Restitution, rescission, or disgorgement;
782 (4) Enforcement of administrative orders;
783 (5) Recovery of investigative and enforcement costs; or
784 (6) Appointment of a receiver.
Page 28

(6) Appointment of a receiver.
2J582II-1 03/17/2026 VSM (H) HSE 2026-828
House Boards, Agencies and Commissions Reported
Substitute for HB586
785 (e) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit
786 criminal prosecution under any provision of law or to require
787 exhaustion of administrative remedies before criminal
788 enforcement.
789 (f) Enforcement under this chapter shall be in addition
790 to, not in lieu of, remedies available under the Deceptive
791 Trade Practices Act.
792 (g) Any contractual provision attempting to waive
793 rights, remedies, or protections under this chapter is void
794 and unenforceable as against public policy.
795 (h) The authority granted under this chapter applies to
796 individual violations as well as to patterns or practices of
797 conduct, whether arising under a single section or multiple
798 sections of this chapter.
799 (i) The existence or nonexistence of an enforcement
800 action by the commission or other governmental agency pursuant
801 to this section shall not bar or diminish any private right of
802 action.
803 §8-42-1.3
804 (a) The commission may impose administrative fines and
805 penalties per violation. The civil penalty shall not exceed
806 one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) per violation,
807 provided that the aggregate civil penalty assessed in a single
808 administrative order shall not exceed ten million dollars
809 ($10,000,000). Each day an act, omission, or violation
810 continues shall constitute a separate violation.
811 (b) In determining the amount of any civil penalty, the
812 commission shall consider all relevant factors, including:
Page 29

commission shall consider all relevant factors, including:
2J582II-1 03/17/2026 VSM (H) HSE 2026-828
House Boards, Agencies and Commissions Reported
Substitute for HB586
813 (1) The nature, gravity, and duration of the violation,
814 including any irreparable harm or risk of harm to property
815 owners;
816 (2) The degree of culpability, intent, or recklessness
817 demonstrated by the violator;
818 (3) The facts, circumstances, and conduct in connection
819 with the investment-oriented real estate activity at issue;
820 (4) The economic benefit, compensation, or other
821 financial gain obtained, directly or indirectly, as a result
822 of the violation;
823 (5) Any prior history of violations of this chapter,
824 the Alabama Securities Act, or related consumer protection
825 laws; and
826 (6) The violator's ability to pay the assessed penalty.
827 (c) In any action or administrative proceeding arising
828 from an unsolicited contract, the following factors may be
829 considered in determining whether the transaction was unfair
830 or deceptive, without automatically creating a right of
831 rescission:
832 (1) The age of the victim.
833 (2) Whether any offer to purchase is below the real
834 property's most recent tax assessed value.
835 (3) Whether the victim received the professional
836 assistance of a licensed real estate agent, as defined in
837 Chapter 27 of Title 34, or a licensed attorney, as defined in
838 Chapter 3 of Title 34.
839 (d) Civil penalties under this section may be assessed
840 for any violation occurring within five years after the
Page 30

for any violation occurring within five years after the
2J582II-1 03/17/2026 VSM (H) HSE 2026-828
House Boards, Agencies and Commissions Reported
Substitute for HB586
841 discovery of the fraud.
842 §8-42-4
843 (a) This section shall govern every unsolicited
844 electronic, telephonic, or video communication, or written
845 inquiry, solicitation, or mailing by any individual or entity,
846 whether acting as a principal, investor, intermediary, or
847 agent, that makes an investment-oriented real property
848 solicitation and that expresses an interest in any of the
849 following:
850 (1) Buying real property or an option to buy real
851 property from the addressee.
852 (2) Buying the real property to which the written
853 inquiry or mailing is addressed.
854 (3) Offering services relating to the sale of real
855 estate.
856 (b)(1) Any unsolicited communication or solicitation
857 governed by this section that constitutes an
858 investment-oriented real property solicitation by any
859 individual or entity that expresses an interest in: (i) buying
860 real property or an option to buy real property from the
861 addressee; (ii) buying the real property to which such written
862 inquiry or mailing is addressed; or (iii) offering services
863 relating to the sale of real estate, shall include consumer
864 protection disclosures as required by the commission.
865 (2) The Commission shall, pursuant to its rulemaking
866 authority and in accordance with the Alabama Administrative
867 Procedures Act, establish standard disclosure language for
868 consumer protection that shall be included in any
Page 31

consumer protection that shall be included in any
2J582II-1 03/17/2026 VSM (H) HSE 2026-828
House Boards, Agencies and Commissions Reported
Substitute for HB586
869 investment-oriented, unsolicited real estate offers as defined
870 in this chapter. The disclosures shall include:
871 a. Notice that the offer may be below fair market
872 value;
873 b. A statement encouraging the real property owner to
874 seek guidance from a licensed real estate agent or attorney of
875 the owner's choice;
876 c. A statement that the owner has no obligation or duty
877 to respond to the solicitation; and
878 d. Contact information for the commission and a
879 statement that the owner may verify the identity,
880 registration, licensure status, and legitimacy of the offeror
881 through the commission.
882 (3) Enforcement of violations of this subsection shall
883 be carried out in accordance with Section 8-42-1.2.
884 (c) A seller may rescind a contract to sell real
885 property entered into as a result of an unsolicited offer
886 within seven days after the contract is executed and before
887 closing if the seller did not receive the professional
888 assistance of a licensed real estate agent, as defined in
889 Chapter 27 of Title 34, or a licensed attorney, as defined in
890 Chapter 3 of Title 34. The seller shall have the right to a
891 seven-day rescission period starting from the date the
892 contract is signed until the closing date. Parties may agree
893 to extend this rescission right up to one day before closing,
894 but the extension must be agreed upon in writing and included
895 in the contract. A rescission must expire at least one day
896 prior to closing, providing a minimum of eight days between
Page 32

prior to closing, providing a minimum of eight days between
2J582II-1 03/17/2026 VSM (H) HSE 2026-828
House Boards, Agencies and Commissions Reported
Substitute for HB586
897 the contract being signed and the closing.
898 (d) A seller who uses the professional assistance of a
899 licensed real estate agent or a licensed attorney of the
900 seller's choosing when the contract is signed does not have a
901 right to rescind the contract unless agreed to by the parties
902 and written in the contract. In no instance shall a right to
903 rescind be extended beyond the closing date. This section
904 shall be interpreted to protect the seller and to ensure the
905 transaction's finality at closing.
906 (e) If the seller meets the criteria in subsection (c)
907 and rescinds the contract within the seven-day period:
908 (1) The seller owes no penalty, fee, or damages;
909 (2) Any contractual penalty provision is void; and
910 (3) Any funds received shall be returned within seven
911 days after cancellation.
912 (f)(1) If real property meets the criteria in
913 subsection (c), then it may not close prior to the expiration
914 of the seven-day cancellation period. No deed, assignment,
915 memorandum, lien, option, encumbrance, or other instrument
916 conveying or affecting an interest in real property may be
917 delivered, assigned, transferred, or recorded during a
918 seven-day cancellation period. This includes:
919 a. Assignment of the purchase contract;
920 b. Double closings; and
921 c. Conveyance to a third party.
922 (2) Any instrument executed or recorded in violation of
923 this subsection is voidable at the election of the seller.
924 (3) Any third party acquiring an interest during the
Page 33

(3) Any third party acquiring an interest during the
2J582II-1 03/17/2026 VSM (H) HSE 2026-828
House Boards, Agencies and Commissions Reported
Substitute for HB586
925 seven-day period takes subject to the seller's statutory right
926 to rescission.
927 (g) Violations of this section shall be enforced in
928 accordance with Section 8-42-1.2.
929 (h) This chapter does not apply to properties that are:
930 (i) subject to an active written listing agreement with a
931 licensed real estate broker; (ii) marketed for sale by the
932 property owner or to an individual attempting to acquire an
933 interest in real estate from another person with whom he or
934 she has an existing business or personal relationship; or
935 (iii) where the property interest being acquired is for the
936 purchaser's personal use or benefit.
937 Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
938 1, 2026.
939
Page 34